Utah statutes.
31A-35-502.   Notification of violation of chapter.
If the commissioner has reason to believe a person licensed as a bail bond
surety company or a bail bond producer has violated this chapter, written
notice shall be sent to that person, advising the person of:
(1)  the alleged violation;
(2)  the commissioner's authority to take action against the person's license;
(3)  the person's right to an administrative hearing under Title 63G, Chapter
4, Administrative Procedures Act; and
(4)  the period of time within which the hearing described in Subsection (3)
shall be requested if the person requests a hearing.
